Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-16-120.
Vesting of rights to benefits under this chapter.

All rights and benefits under this chapter shall be subject to future legislative change or revision, and no beneficiary shall be deemed to have any vested right to any benefits under this chapter, except for the right of withdrawal and payment to the surviving spouse or the member’s estate of the difference between amounts paid and benefits received as set forth in Code Sections 47-16-102 and 47-16-103 and except for retirement benefits under Code Section 47-16-101, after approval of such benefits under Code Section 47-16-100, provided that benefits deemed vested under this Code section shall be subject to reduction under Code Section 47-16-121.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 21; Ga. L. 1981, p. 694, § 2.

47-16-121.
Reduction of benefits when available funds are actuarially insufficient; resumption of payments; personal liability of board for such reductions.

If the board determines that the funds derived from the sources provided for in this chapter are not actuarially sufficient at any time to enable the board to pay in full each person determined to be entitled to benefits under this chapter and all contingent and other liabilities, then a pro rata percentage of such payments shall be made to each person entitled thereto until the funds are sufficiently replenished to enable the board to resume full payments in accordance with the terms of this chapter. Before resuming such payments in full, all persons who have received reduced payments shall be paid all deficiencies so that they shall have received full payment of their benefits. In no event shall any member of the board be held personally liable to any person for any deficiencies resulting from reduced payments under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 22.

47-16-122.
Exemption of funds from attachment, garnishment, or judgment; assignability.

None of the funds under this chapter shall be subject to attachment, garnishment, or judgments rendered against the person entitled to receive such funds. Such funds shall not be assignable, but shall be paid to the person determined to be entitled to receive them under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 20.

47-16-123.
Exemptions of moneys and rights accruing under this chapter from taxation.

The right to any pension, annuity, allowance, or benefit; the right to the return of contributions; a pension, annuity, allowance, or benefit itself; any optional benefit; any other right accrued or accruing to any person under this chapter; and any moneys under this chapter shall be exempt from any tax imposed by this state or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, except as provided in Code Section 48-7-27.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-16-123

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 7; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1449, § 8.